Maryland, session 2026, SB0142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–405.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Institution” means:
(i) any campus of the University System of Maryland, any
community college established under Title 16 of the Education Article, Morgan State
University, or St. Mary’s College;
(ii) any private institution of higher education that grants a member
a tuition waiver of at least 50%;
(iii) any public postsecondary vocational–technical or trade school; or
(iv) any private postsecondary vocational–technical [or trade school
that grants a member a tuition waiver of at least 50%], TRADE, OR CAREER SCHOOL
RECOGNIZED BY THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION OR THE
MARYLAND APPRENTICESHIP AND TRAINING COUNCIL.
(3) “Member” means an individual who:
– 1 –

Ch. 144 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) is regularly enlisted in the National Guard; or
(ii) holds a commission in the National Guard.
(4) (I) “TRAINING ASSISTANCE” MEANS EXPENSES DIRECTLY
RELATED TO PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT RESOURCES REQUIRED FOR
PARTICIPATION IN A COURSE OR PROGRAM AT AN INSTITUTION.
(II) “TRAINING ASSISTANCE” INCLUDES:
1. INDUSTRY–REQUIRED TOOLS, TECHNOLOGY, AND
PROFESSIONAL EQUIPMENT;
2. PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT, UNIFORMS,
AND SPECIALIZED CLOTHING;
3. CERTIFICATION AND LICENSING COSTS NECESSARY
FOR EMPLOYMENT; AND
4. TRADE–RELATED PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
MATERIALS, SOFTWARE, AND DIGITAL RESOURCES.
(5) (i) “Tuition” means the basic instructional charge for
undergraduate, graduate, professional, vocational–technical, and trade school credit
courses and related fees at an institution.
(ii) “Tuition” does not include charges for self–supporting programs.
(b) (1) To the extent that funds are provided in the State budget, the
Department may provide assistance equal to 100% of the cost of in–State tuition AND
TRAINING ASSISTANCE for any regularly scheduled undergraduate credit course,
graduate credit course, professional credit course, vocational–technical course, or trade
course for any active member attending an institution who is certified as eligible by the
Adjutant General.
(2) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, a member who receives
assistance under paragraph (1) of this subsection for an undergraduate credit,
vocational–technical, or trade OR CAREER course shall remain an active member for at
least 2 years following the completion of the course.
(3) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, a member who receives
assistance under paragraph (1) of this subsection for a graduate or professional credit
course shall remain an active member for at least 4 years following the completion of the
course.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 144
(4) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, if a member receives
assistance under paragraph (1) of this subsection, and is a member of a unit that has been
disbanded on or after September 1, 2013, due to budgetary cuts, Base Realignment and
Closure, or any other reason, the member may satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2) or
paragraph (3) of this subsection by transferring to another active duty, reserve, or National
Guard Unit in the State or in another state.
(5) If a member who receives assistance under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is offered early separation by the military following the disbanding of the
member’s unit due to budget cuts, Base Realignment and Closure, or any other reason, the
member is excused from the requirements of paragraph (2) or paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(c) (1) The Adjutant General may not certify a member as eligible unless the
member is:
(i) enlisted and has at least 24 months remaining to serve on the
current enlistment of the member; or
(ii) an officer or warrant officer and agrees in writing to serve for a
minimum of 24 months.
(2) The 24–month requirement runs from the first day of classes for the
semester.
(d) If a recipient of tuition assistance under this section is discharged from the
National Guard for a reason designated by the Adjutant General, the assistance terminates
and the member shall reimburse the Department the amount of tuition assistance received
for that semester within 30 days of discharge.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –